Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
County Farm Safety Programs

247.405.
Implementation of county farm safety programs.

In order to educate the citizens of the Commonwealth on the significance and importance of farm safety, the department shall assist counties in implementing farm safety programs by making grants when funds are available to eligible county organizations to assist the organizations in promoting their farm safety programs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 369, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

247.406.
Grants to county organization for farm safety program — Annual report.

For a county organization to be eligible for funding, the following requirements shall be met:

The organization shall be incorporated as nonprofit under KRS Chapter 273; and

The organization shall submit a business plan to the department detailing how the corporation will operate and how it intends to incorporate a farm safety plan in its overall farm safety program.

If the county organization’s business plan is approved by the department, and if funding is available, the department shall distribute a grant of two thousand dollars ($2,000) to the organization.

The county organization shall make an annual written report to the department regarding the activities of the organization’s farm safety program and the disposition of the grant money.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 369, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 117, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

247.407.
Authority for administrative regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of KRS

247.405

to

247.407

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 369, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.